Utah statutes.
78B-6-306.   Bail bond -- Form.

When a direction to allow the person arrested to post bail is contained in the warrant of attachment, the person shall be released if bond is posted and the person executes a written promise to appear on the return of the warrant, and abide by the order of the court or judge.

